Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1169
Department;
complaint; notice of hearing; process; hearings; findings; suspension or revocation
of license.

(1) The department may, upon its own
motion, whenever it has reason to believe the Livestock Auction Market Act
has been violated, or upon verified complaint of any person in writing, investigate
the actions of any market license holder, and if the department finds probable
cause to do so, shall file a complaint against the market license holder which
shall be set down for hearing before the director upon fifteen days'
notice served upon such market license holder either by personal service upon
him or her or by registered or certified mail prior to such hearing.

(2) The director shall have the power to administer oaths,
certify to all official acts, and subpoena any person in this state as a witness,
to compel the producing of books and papers, and to take the testimony of
any person on deposition in the same manner as is prescribed by law in the
procedure before the courts of this state in civil cases. Processes issued
by the director shall extend to all parts of the state and may be served by
any person authorized to serve processes. Each witness who shall appear by
the order of the director at any hearing shall receive for such attendance
the same fees allowed by law to witnesses in civil cases appearing in the
district court and mileage at the same rate provided in section 81-1176, which
amount shall be paid by the party at whose request such witness is subpoenaed.
When any witness has not been required to attend at the request of any party,
but has been subpoenaed by the director, his or her fees and mileage shall
be paid by the director in the same manner as other expenses are paid under
the Livestock Auction Market Act.

(3) All powers of the director as provided in this section
shall likewise be applicable to hearings held on applications for the issuance
of a market license.

(4) Formal finding by the director after due hearing
that any market license holder (a) has ceased to conduct a livestock auction
market business, (b) has been guilty of fraud or misrepresentation as to the
titles, charges, number, brands, weights, proceeds of sale, or ownership of
livestock, (c) has violated any of the provisions of the Livestock Auction
Market Act, or (d) has violated any of the rules or regulations adopted and
promulgated under the act, shall be sufficient cause for the suspension or
revocation of the market license of the offending livestock auction market
operator.

Laws 1963, c. 319, § 13, p. 966;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 95;

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 69;

Laws 2001, LB 197, § 13;

Laws 2013, LB78, § 7;

Laws 2014, LB884, § 27.